Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 6. Temporary Registration for Presidential Elections.

§§ 24.2-436 through 24.2-439.
Repealed by Acts 2001, cc. 616 and 628.

Editor’s note.

Former §§

24.2-436

through 24.2-439, related to temporary registration for presidential elections, was derived from Acts 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 119, §§ 24.1-72.1 through 24.1-72.4; 1972, c. 620; 1977, c. 490; 1982, c. 650; 1993, c. 641; 2000, c. 328.